Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB265.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2794YC (3) 91 sc/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 97B.49B, subsection 1, paragraph a, 1 subparagraph (6), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 (6) For each active or inactive vested member retiring 3 on or after July 1, 2003, and before July 1, 2025, sixty 4 percent plus, if applicable, an additional three-eighths of 5 one percentage point for each additional calendar quarter of 6 eligible service beyond twenty-two years of service for the 7 member, not to exceed a total of twelve additional percentage 8 points. 9 Sec. 2. Section 97B.49B, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 10 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 11 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (7) For each active or inactive vested 12 member retiring on or after July 1, 2025, sixty percent plus, 13 if applicable, an additional five-eighths of one percentage 14 point for each additional calendar quarter of eligible service 15 beyond twenty-two years of service for the member, not to 16 exceed a total of twenty additional percentage points. 17 Sec. 3. Section 97B.49B, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 18 to read as follows: 19 2. Calculation of monthly allowance. Notwithstanding 20 other provisions of this chapter , a member who is or has 21 been employed in a protection occupation who retires on or 22 after July 1, 1994, and at the time of retirement is at least 23 fifty-five years of age , or is at least fifty years of age with 24 at least twenty-two years of eligible service, may elect to 25 receive, in lieu of the receipt of any benefits as calculated 26 pursuant to section 97B.49A or 97B.49D , a monthly retirement 27 allowance equal to one-twelfth of an amount equal to the 28 applicable percentage of the three-year average covered wage 29 as a member who has been employed in a protection occupation 30 multiplied by a fraction of years of service, with benefits 31 payable during the memberâs lifetime. 32 Sec. 4. Section 97B.49B, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 33 following new subsection: 34 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. Annual adjustment of allowance. A 35 -1- LSB 2794YC (3) 91 sc/ns 1/ 3 H.F. _____ member who retires from a protection occupation on or after 1 July 1, 2025, and who receives a monthly retirement allowance 2 under this section, shall have the monthly retirement allowance 3 adjusted as follows: 4 a. On each July 1, the monthly retirement allowance 5 authorized in this section and payable to a member retired 6 prior to that date, and to a beneficiary or contingent 7 annuitant entitled to a monthly retirement allowance prior 8 to that date, shall be adjusted by adding to the monthly 9 retirement allowance payable on that date an amount equal to 10 the sum of one and one-half percent of the monthly retirement 11 allowance payable on that date. 12 b. A retired member, beneficiary, or contingent annuitant 13 shall not be eligible for an annual readjustment of allowance 14 provided in this subsection unless the member has twenty-two 15 years of eligible service and attained the age of fifty years 16 prior to the memberâs termination of employment. 17 c. A retired member, beneficiary, or contingent annuitant 18 that receives an annual adjustment of allowance provided in 19 this subsection shall not be eligible for the retirement 20 dividends under section 97B.49F. 21